Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-140 of Title 26, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Members of the active uniform services of the United States on a
temporary duty assignment in the State of Oklahoma, and their
spouses, shall be permitted to serve as precinct officials in any
county of the state regardless of their home of record.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12547 MJ 02/10/25

Req. No. 12547 Page 1

























Req. No. 12547 Page 2